Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FORGOTTEN HEROES RANGES AND RETREAT.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the Forgotten Heroes Ranges and Retreat to promote shooting sports for persons with a disability and to host a persons with a disability shooting day. new text end